Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 6. Wyoming Structured Settlement Protection Act

Effective dates. —

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2006.

§ 1-16-601.
Short
title.

This act shall be known
and may be cited as the Wyoming Structured Settlement Protection Act.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Am Jur 2d and C.J.S. references

Construction and application of state structured settlement protection acts. 27 A.L.R.6th 323.

§ 1-16-602.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Annuity issuer” means an insurer that has issued a contract to fund periodic payments under a structured settlement;

“Dependents” include a payee’s spouse and minor children and all other persons for whom the payee is legally obligated to provide support, including alimony;

“Discounted present value” means the present value of future payments determined by discounting the payments to the present value using the most recently published applicable federal rate for determining the present value of an annuity, as issued by the United States Internal Revenue Service;

“Gross advance amount” means the sum payable to the payee or for the payee’s account as consideration for a transfer of structured settlement payment rights before any reductions for transfer expenses or other deductions to be made from such consideration;

“Independent professional advice” means advice of an attorney, certified public accountant, actuary or other licensed professional adviser;

“Interested parties” means, with respect to any structured settlement, the payee, any beneficiary irrevocably designated under the annuity contract to receive payments following the payee’s death, the annuity issuer, the structured settlement obligor and any other party that has continuing rights or obligations under the structured settlement;

“Net advance amount” means the gross advance amount less the aggregate amount of the actual and estimated transfer expenses required to be disclosed under W.S. 1-16-603(e);

“Payee” means an individual who is receiving tax free payments under a structured settlement and proposes to make a transfer of payment rights thereunder;

“Periodic payments” includes both recurring payments and scheduled future lump sum payments;

“Qualified assignment agreement” means an agreement providing for a qualified assignment within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. 130;

“Settled claim” means the original tort claim resolved by a structured settlement;

“Structured settlement” means an arrangement for periodic payment of damages for personal injuries or sickness established by settlement agreement or judgment in resolution of a tort claim;

“Structured settlement agreement” means the agreement, judgment, stipulation or release embodying the terms of the structured settlement;

“Structured settlement obligor” means, with respect to a structured settlement, the party that has a continuing obligation to make periodic payments to the payee under a structured settlement agreement or a qualified assignment agreement;

“Structured settlement rights” means rights to receive periodic payments under a structured settlement, whether from the structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer, where:

The payee is domiciled in, or the domicile or principal place of business of the structured settlement obligor or the annuity issuer is located in, this state;

The structured settlement agreement was approved by a court in this state; or

The structured settlement agreement is expressly governed by the laws of this state.

“Terms of the structured settlement” include, with respect to a structured settlement agreement, the terms of the structured settlement agreement, the annuity contract, a qualified assignment agreement and any order or other approval of any court that authorized or approved the structured settlement;

“Transfer” means any sale, assignment, pledge, hypothecation or other alienation or encumbrance of structured settlement payment rights made by a payee for consideration, provided that the term “transfer” does not include the creation or perfection of a security agreement in structured settlement payment rights under a blanket security agreement entered into with an insured depository institution, in the absence of any action to redirect the structured settlement payments to the insured depository institution, or an agent or successor in interest thereof, or otherwise to enforce the blanket security interest against the structured settlement payment rights;

“Transfer agreement” means the agreement providing for a transfer of structured settlement payment rights;

“Transfer expenses” means all expenses of a transfer that are required under the transfer agreement to be paid by the payee or deducted from the gross advance amount, including without limitation, court filing fees, attorneys’ fees, escrow fees, lien recordation fees, judgment and lien search fees, finders’ fees, commissions and other payments to a broker or other intermediary. “Transfer expenses” do not include preexisting obligations of the payee payable for the payee’s account from the proceeds of a transfer;

“Transferee” means a party acquiring or proposing to acquire structured settlement payment rights through a transfer;

“This act” means W.S.

1-16-601

through

1-16-607

.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-16-603.
Required
disclosures to payee.

Not less than three (3) days prior to the date on which a payee signs a transfer agreement, the transferee shall provide to the payee a separate disclosure statement, in bold type no smaller than fourteen (14) points, setting forth:

The amounts and due dates of the structured settlement payments to be transferred;

The aggregate amount of the payments;

The discounted present value of the payments to be transferred and the amount of the applicable federal rate used in calculating the discounted present value;

The gross advance amount;

An itemized listing of all applicable transfer fees, other than attorneys’ fees and related disbursements payable in connection with the transferee’s application for approval of the transfer and the transferee’s best estimate of the amount of any such fees and disbursements;

The net advance amount;

The amount of any penalties or liquidated damages payable by the payee in the event of any breach of the transfer agreement by the payee;

A statement that the payee has the right to cancel the transfer agreement without penalty or further obligation not later than the third business day after the date the agreement is signed by the payee.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-16-604.
Approval
of transfers of structured settlement payment rights.

No direct or indirect transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall be effective and no structured settlement obligor or annuity issuer shall be required to make any payment directly or indirectly to any transferee of structured settlement payment rights unless the transfer has been approved in advance in a final court order based on express findings by the court that:

The transfer is in the best interest of the payee, taking into account the welfare and support of the payee’s dependents;

The payee has been advised in writing by the transferee to seek independent professional advice regarding the transfer and has either received such advice or knowingly waived such advice in writing; and

The transfer does not contravene any applicable statute or the order of any court or other government authority.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 1-16-605.
Effects
of transfer of structured settlement payment rights.

Following a transfer of structured settlement payment rights under this act:

The structured settlement obligor and the annuity issuer shall, as to all parties except the transferee, be discharged and released from any and all liability for the transferred payments;

The transferee shall be liable to the structured settlement obligor and the annuity issuer:

If the transfer contravenes the terms of the structured settlement, for any taxes incurred by such parties as a consequence of the transfer; and

For any other liabilities or costs, including reasonable costs and attorneys’ fees arising from compliance by such parties with the order of the court or arising as a consequence of the transferee’s failure to comply with this act.

Neither the annuity issuer nor the structured settlement obligor may be required to divide any periodic payment between the payee and any transferee or assignee or between two (2) or more transferees or assignees; and

Any further transfer of structured settlement payment rights by the payee may be made only after compliance with all requirements of this act.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-16-602(a)(xxi).

Cited

in

Dave v. Valdez, 2012 WY 59, 275 P.3d 485,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Apr. 13, 2012).

§ 1-16-606.
Procedure
for approval of transfers.

An application under this act for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall be made by the transferee and may be brought in the Wyoming district court that approved the structured settlement payment rights, or the Wyoming district court in the county where the payee resides without regard to where the structured settlement payment rights may have accrued.

Not less than twenty (20) days prior to the scheduled hearing on an application for approval of a transfer of structured settlement payment rights under W.S.

1-16-604

, the transferee shall file with the court and serve all interested parties a notice of the proposed transfer and application for its authorization, including with the notice:

A copy of the transferee’s application for transfer;

A copy of the transfer agreement;

A copy of the disclosure statement required under W.S.

1-16-603

;

A listing of each of the payee’s dependents, together with each dependent’s age and date of birth;

Notification that any interested party may support, oppose or otherwise respond to the transferee’s application, either in person or by counsel, by submitting written comments to the court or by participating in the hearing; and

Notification of the time and place of the hearing and notification of the manner in which and the time by which written responses to the application shall be filed, which time shall be not less than fifteen (15) days after service of the transferee’s notice, in order to be considered by the court.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-16-602(a)(xxi).

§ 1-16-607.
General
provisions; construction.

The provisions of this act may not be waived by any payee.

Any transfer agreement entered into on or after July 1, 2006 by a payee who resides in this state shall provide that disputes under the transfer agreement, including any claim that the payee has breached the agreement, shall be determined in and under the laws of this state. No transfer agreement shall authorize the transferee or any other party to confess judgment or consent to entry of judgment against the payee.

No transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall extend to any payments that are life-contingent unless, prior to the date on which the payee signs the transfer agreement, the transferee has established and has agreed to maintain procedures reasonably satisfactory to the annuity issuer and the structured settlement obligor for:

Periodically confirming the payee’s survival; and

Giving the annuity issuer and the structured settlement obligor prompt written notice in the event of the payee’s death.

No payee who proposes to make a transfer of structured settlement payment rights shall incur any penalty, forfeit any application fee or other payment, or otherwise incur any liability to the proposed transferee or any assignee based on any failure of the transfer to satisfy the requirements of this act.

Nothing contained in this act shall be construed to authorize any transfer of structured settlement payment rights in contravention of any law or to imply that any transfer under a transfer agreement entered into prior to July 1, 2006 is valid or invalid.

Compliance with the requirements of W.S.

1-16-603

and fulfillment of the conditions set forth in W.S.

1-16-604

shall be solely the responsibility of the transferee in any transfer of structured settlement payment rights, and neither the structured settlement obligor nor the annuity issuer shall bear any responsibility for, or any liability arising from, noncompliance with the requirements of W.S.

1-16-603

or failure to fulfill the conditions set forth in W.S.

1-16-604

.

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 61, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 1-16-602(a)(xxi).